Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB655.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) As follows:(1) An amount paid by a business that incurs costs by offering free membership at a fitness facility to a qualified individual shall be allowed as a deduction from taxable income 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 on the annual personal income tax return. The amount paid as a free membership at a fitness facility to a qualified individual may not exceed the dollar amount paid as a membership at a fitness facility to any other individual. The deduction shall not result in taxable income being less than zero.(2) For purposes of this subsection, the term "qualified individual" means an individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Section 401(3)1 of the act is amended by adding a phrase to read:Section 401. Definitions.--The following words, terms, and phrases, when used in this article, shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(3) "Taxable income." 1. * * *(v) (1) An additional deduction shall be allowed from taxable income in an amount equal to the amount paid for costs by offering free membership at a fitness facility to a qualified individual. The amount paid as a free membership at a fitness facility to a qualified individual shall not exceed the dollar amount paid as a membership at a fitness facility to any other individual.(2) For purposes of this paragraph, the term "qualified individual" means an individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the 20250SB0655PN0708 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 3. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:* * *(14.2) Article XVIII-I.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IPERSONAL HEALTH INVESTMENT TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article.This article relates to personal health investment tax credits.Section 1802-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Qualified individual." An individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve 20250SB0655PN0708 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions)."Qualified sports and fitness expenses." Amounts paid for the sole purpose of participating in a physical activity, including membership at a fitness facility, participation or instruction in physical exercise or physical activity or equipment used in a program, including a self-directed program, of physical exercise or physical activity."Resident individual." As defined in section 301."Tax credit." A personal health investment tax credit provided for under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III.Section 1803-I. Tax credit.(a) Eligibility.--A taxpayer who is a qualified individual and incurs qualified sports and fitness expenses in a taxable year may claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's tax liability.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit may not exceed $600 per taxpayer per taxable year.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit on a return filed under section 330.(d) Applicability of tax credit.--A tax credit shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability.Section 1804-I. Prohibitions.The following apply:(1) A taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, obtain a 20250SB0655PN0708 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 refund of or sell, assign or transfer a tax credit.(2) A taxpayer may not claim a tax credit for the same qualified sports and fitness expenses used to claim a tax credit on a return filed by another taxpayer.Section 1805-I. Duties of department.The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 5. The addition of sections 303(a.13) and 401(3)1(v) and Article XVIII-I of the act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2024.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0655PN0708 - 5 - 123456789101112